New York, session 2025-2026, S2234.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1, 2 and 3 of section 20 of the workers' 2 compensation law are renumbered subdivisions 2, 3 and 4 and a new subdi- 3 vision 1 is added to read as follows: 4 1. The board shall index a claim for workers' compensation immediately 5 upon the receipt of a medical report in addition to either a claim filed 6 by the injured worker or an employer's report of injury or illness. 7 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 20 of the workers' compensation law, 8 as amended by chapter 635 of the laws of 1996 and as renumbered by 9 section one of this act, is amended to read as follows: 10 2. [At any time after the expiration of the first seven days of disa- 11 bility on the part of an injured employee, or at any time after the 12 employee's death, a claim for compensation may be presented to the 13 employer or to the chair. The] Within sixty days after a claim for 14 compensation has been indexed, the board shall hold an initial hearing 15 for each claim in which the injured worker asserts lost wages or lost 16 time due to injury and shall have full power and authority to determine 17 all questions in relation to the payment of claims presented to it for 18 compensation under the provisions of this chapter. The chair or board 19 shall thereafter make or cause to be made such investigation as it deems 20 necessary, and upon application of either party or an attorney repres- 21 enting either party, shall order a hearing before a referee to take 22 place within forty-five calendar days of the application from either 23 party, and within thirty days after a claim for compensation is submit- 24 ted under this section, or such hearing closed, shall make or deny an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06076-02-5 S. 2234 2 1 award, determining such claim for compensation, and file the same in the 2 office of the chair. No application for a hearing made by a party or an 3 attorney pursuant to this section shall be subject to limitations, 4 prerequisites, or penalties imposed by the board. Immediately after such 5 filing the chair shall send to the parties a copy of the decision. Upon 6 a hearing pursuant to this section either party may present evidence and 7 be represented by counsel. The decision of the board shall be final as 8 to all questions of fact, and, except as provided in section twenty- 9 three of this article, as to all questions of law. Except as provided 10 in section twenty-seven of this article, all awards of the board shall 11 draw simple interest from thirty days after the making thereof at the 12 rate provided in section five thousand four of the civil practice law 13 and rules. Whenever a hearing or proceeding for the determination of a 14 claim for compensation is begun before a referee, pursuant to the 15 provisions of this chapter, such hearing or proceeding or any adjourned 16 hearing thereon shall continue before the same referee until a final 17 determination awarding or denying compensation, except in the absence, 18 inability or disqualification to act of such referee, or for other good 19 cause, in which event such hearing or proceeding may be continued before 20 another referee by order of the chair or board. 21 § 3. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 3 of section 25 of the workers' 22 compensation law, as amended by chapter 61 of the laws of 1986, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 (c) The board shall keep an accurate record of all hearings held. All 25 decisions shall be issued to the injured worker in their native 26 language. Whenever a hearing must be continued or adjourned because the 27 carrier or employer has engaged in dilatory tactics or exhibited unjus- 28 tified lack of preparedness, the board shall impose a penalty of twen- 29 ty-five dollars to be paid to the fund created by subdivision two of 30 section one hundred fifty-one of this chapter and shall in addition make 31 an award of seventy-five dollars payable to the injured worker or [his 32 or her dependants] their dependents. Dilatory tactics may include but 33 shall not be limited to: failing to subpoena medical witnesses or to 34 secure an order to show cause as directed by the referee, failing to 35 bring proper files, failing to appear, failing to produce witnesses or 36 documents after they have been requested by the referee or examiner or 37 as directed by the hearing notice, unnecessarily protracting the 38 production of evidence, or engaging in a pattern of delay which unduly 39 delays resolution, except that no penalty shall be imposed nor award 40 made under this subdivision if the carrier or employer produces evidence 41 sufficient to excuse its conduct to the satisfaction of the referee. 42 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.